West Virginia, session 2026, HB5137.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16A. WEST VIRGINIA PARKWAYS AUTHORITY. §17-16A-31. County school buses exempt from payment of tolls. County school buses shall be exempt from the payment of toll road fees in the course of their regular use within a school system. Regular use is defined as transporting students to and from a school, transporting students to school-related events, such as field trips, after school events, and sporting events, and when the driver drives the bus for maintenance.